Georgia statutes. 
(1) Preparation by the redevelopment agency of a redevelopment plan for the proposed tax allocation district and its submission for consent to the political subdivision or board of education required to consent, if the plan proposes to include in the tax allocation increment ad valorem property taxes levied by a political subdivision or board of education required to consent to such inclusion under Code Section 36-44-9, or if the plan proposes to pledge for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds and other redevelopment costs the general funds of a county required to consent to such inclusion under Code Section 36-44-9;

(2) Submission of the redevelopment plan to the local legislative body of the political subdivision whose area of operation will include the tax allocation district;

(3) Adoption by the local legislative body of a resolution approving the redevelopment plan and which:

(A) Describes the boundaries of the tax allocation district with sufficient definiteness to identify with ordinary and reasonable certainty the territory included. The boundaries shall include only those whole units of property assessed for ad valorem property tax purposes;

(B) Creates the district on December 31 following the adoption of the resolution or on December 31 of a subsequent year as determined by the local legislative body;

(C) Assigns a name to the district for identification purposes. The first district created shall be known as "Tax Allocation District Number 1," followed by the name of the political subdivision within whose area of operation the district is located;

(D) Specifies the estimated tax allocation increment base;

(E) Specifies ad valorem property taxes to be used for computing tax allocation increments;

(F) Specifies the property proposed to be pledged for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds which property may include positive tax allocation increments derived from the tax allocation district, all or part of general funds derived from the tax allocation district, and any other property from which bonds may be paid under Code Section 36-44-14, as determined by the political subdivision subject to the limitations of Code Sections 36-44-9 and 36-44-20; and

(G) Contains findings that:

(i) The redevelopment area on the whole has not been subject to growth and development through private enterprise and would not reasonably be anticipated to be developed without the approval of the redevelopment plan or includes one or more natural, historical, or cultural assets which have not been adequately preserved or protected and such asset or assets would not reasonably be anticipated to be adequately preserved, protected, or improved without the approval of the redevelopment plan; and

(ii) The improvement of the area is likely to enhance the value of a substantial portion of the other real property in the district.

If any information required to be included in the resolution approving the redevelopment plan under subparagraphs (A) through (G) of this paragraph is contained in the redevelopment plan, then the resolution approving the redevelopment plan may incorporate by reference that portion of the redevelopment plan containing said information; and

(4) A certified copy of any resolution giving the consent required under paragraph (1) of this Code section must be submitted to the local legislative body of the political subdivision whose area of operation will include the tax allocation district prior to inclusion of such ad valorem property taxes or general funds in calculation of the tax allocation increment.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-8, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-9. Computing tax allocation increments; property tax included; use of tax funds.

Statute text

(a) When a tax allocation district is created within the area of operation of a municipality by the local legislative body of such municipality, property taxes for computing tax allocation increments shall be based on all ad valorem property taxes levied by the municipality. If the municipality has an independent school system, ad valorem property taxes levied for educational purposes by the municipality shall be included in computing the tax allocation increments if the local legislative body of the municipality is empowered to make the determination of the municipal ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes. If the board of education of the independent school system is empowered to set the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes and the local legislative body of the municipality does not have the authority to modify such rate set by the board of education, the tax allocation increment shall not be computed on the basis of municipal taxes for educational purposes unless the board of education of the independent school system consents, by resolution duly adopted by said board of education, to the inclusion of educational ad valorem property taxes as a basis for computing tax allocation increments.

(b) County ad valorem property taxes may be included in the computation of tax allocation increments of a municipal tax allocation district if the local legislative body of the county consents to such inclusion by resolution duly adopted by said local legislative body. For those municipalities which do not have an independent school system, ad valorem property taxes levied for county school district purposes may be included in the computation of tax allocation increments of a municipal tax allocation district if the county board of education or the local legislative body of the county, whichever is authorized to establish the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes, consents to such inclusion by resolution duly adopted by said board of education or local legislative body, respectively.

(c) When a tax allocation district is created within the area of operation of a county by the local legislative body of the county, property taxes for computing tax allocation increments shall be based on all county ad valorem property taxes levied for county governmental purposes. Ad valorem property taxes levied for county school district purposes may be included in the computation of tax allocation increments for a county tax allocation district if the board of education of the county school district or the local legislative body of the county, whichever is authorized to establish the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes, consents to such inclusion by resolution duly adopted by said board of education or local legislative body, respectively.

(d) When a tax allocation district is created within the area of operation of a consolidated government by the local legislative body of the consolidated government, property taxes for computing tax allocation increments shall be based on all consolidated government ad valorem property taxes levied for consolidated government purposes. Ad valorem property taxes levied for school district purposes within the boundaries of the consolidated government may be included in the computation of tax allocation increments for a consolidated government tax allocation district if the board of education of such school district or the local legislative body of the consolidated government, whichever is authorized to establish the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes within the school district, consents to such inclusion by resolution duly adopted by said board of education or local legislative body, respectively.

(e) The resolution of any county, municipality, consolidated government, or board of education consenting to the inclusion of ad valorem property taxes in the computation of tax increments shall not specify the inclusion of any ad valorem property taxes not specified in the resolution creating the tax allocation district.

(f) A county may pledge all or part of county general funds derived from a municipal tax allocation district for payment or security of payment of tax allocation bonds issued by the municipality and for payment of other redevelopment costs of the tax allocation district if the local legislative body of the county consents to the use of such general funds by resolution duly adopted by said local legislative body.

(g) Any consent by a local board of education to the inclusion of educational ad valorem property taxes as a basis for computing tax allocation increments and any authorization to use such funds for such purposes that was approved before January 1, 2009, and not rescinded or repealed prior to April 22, 2009, is ratified and confirmed pursuant to the authority granted by Article IX, Section II, Paragraph VII of the Constitution, as amended by a resolution ratified at the November, 2008 general election, Ga. L. 2008, p. 777, to authorize the use of county, municipal, and school tax funds, or any combination thereof, for redevelopment purposes and programs notwithstanding Article VIII, Section VI or any other provision of the Constitution and regardless of whether any county, municipality, or local board of education approved the use of such tax funds for such purposes and programs before or after January 1, 2009.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-9, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, "prior to April 22, 2009," was substituted for "prior to the effective date of this Code section" in subsection (g).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Use of local school taxes for redevelopment. - School system, development authority, and others were properly granted summary judgment in a suit challenging the allocation of school taxes because the 2008 amendments to Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. VII(b) and O.C.G.A. § 36-44-9(g), governing tax allocation districts, changed the law and retroactively allowed use of local school taxes for general redevelopment purposes. Sherman v. Atlanta Indep. Sch. Sys., 293 Ga. 268, 744 S.E.2d 26 (2013).

36-44-10. Determination of tax allocation increment base of tax allocation district; annual notice.

Statute text

(a) No later than the effective date of the creation of the tax allocation district, the redevelopment agency shall apply, in writing, to the state revenue commissioner for a determination of the tax allocation increment base of the tax allocation district. Within a reasonable time, and not exceeding 60 days after the effective date of the creation of the tax allocation district, the state revenue commissioner shall certify such tax allocation increment base, as of the effective date of the creation of the tax allocation district, to the redevelopment agency, and such certification, unless amended pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, shall constitute the tax allocation increment base of the tax allocation district.

(b) If the local legislative body of a political subdivision adopts an amendment to the resolution which created a tax allocation district and such amendment changes the boundaries of that tax allocation district so as to cause additional redevelopment costs for which tax allocation increments may be received by the political subdivision, the tax allocation increment base for the revised or amended district shall be redetermined pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section as of the effective date of such amendment. The tax allocation increment base as redetermined under this subsection is effective for the purposes of this chapter only if it exceeds the original tax allocation increment base determined under subsection (a) of this Code section.

(c) It is a rebuttable presumption that any property within a tax allocation district acquired or leased as lessee by the political subdivision, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, within one year immediately preceding the date of the creation of the district was so acquired or leased in contemplation of the creation of the district. The presumption may be rebutted by the political subdivision with proof that the property was so leased or acquired primarily for a purpose other than to reduce the tax allocation increment base. If the presumption is not rebutted, in determining the tax allocation increment base of the district, but for no other purpose, the taxable status of the property shall be determined as though such lease or acquisition had not occurred.

(d) For each political subdivision whose area of operation includes a tax allocation district, the county board of tax assessors, joint city-county board of tax assessors, or board of tax assessors for a consolidated government, as the case may be, shall identify upon the tax digests of the political subdivision those parcels of property which are within each existing tax allocation district, specifying the name of each district. A similar notation shall appear on tax digests submitted to the state revenue commissioner pursuant to Code Section 48-5-302, relative to the submission of tax digests to the state revenue commissioner.

(e) The county board of tax assessors, joint city-county board of tax assessors, or consolidated government board of tax assessors shall annually give notice to the county tax collector or tax commissioner and to the municipal official responsible for collecting municipal ad valorem property taxes as to both the current taxable value of property subject to ad valorem property taxes within each tax allocation district and the tax allocation increment base. The notice shall also explain that any taxes collected as a result of increases in the tax allocation increment base constitute tax allocation increments and shall be paid to the appropriate political subdivision as provided by subsection (b) of Code Section 36-44-11.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-11. Positive tax allocation increments.

Statute text

(a) Positive tax allocation increments of a tax allocation district shall be allocated to the political subdivision which created the district for each year from the effective date of the creation of the district until that time when all redevelopment costs and all tax allocation bonds of the district have been paid or provided for, subject to any agreement with bondholders. General funds derived from the tax allocation district which have been pledged for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds and other redevelopment costs of the tax allocation district shall also be allocated to the political subdivision which created the district for each year from the effective date of the creation of the district until that time when all redevelopment costs and all tax allocation bonds have been paid or provided for, subject to any agreement with bondholders.

(b) (1) Each county tax collector or tax commissioner, municipal official responsible for collecting municipal ad valorem property taxes, or consolidated government official responsible for collecting consolidated government ad valorem property taxes shall, on the dates provided by law for the payment of taxes collected to the respective political subdivisions, pay over to the appropriate fiscal officer of each political subdivision having created a tax allocation district, out of taxes collected on behalf of such political subdivision, including but not limited to taxes collected for a political subdivision or board of education consenting, pursuant to Code Section 36-44-9, to inclusion of its ad valorem property taxes in the computation of tax allocation increments for that tax allocation district, that portion, if any, which represents positive tax allocation increments payable to such political subdivision.

(2) In addition, each county shall, upon receipt, pay over to the appropriate fiscal officer of each municipality having created a tax allocation district that portion, if any, of its general funds derived from the tax allocation district which have been pledged for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds and for payment of other redevelopment costs of the tax allocation district pursuant to Code Section 36-44-9.

(c) All positive tax allocation increments received for a tax allocation district shall be deposited into a special fund for the district upon receipt by the fiscal officer of the political subdivision. All general funds derived from the tax allocation district which have been pledged for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds and other redevelopment costs of the tax allocation district shall be deposited upon receipt into the special fund. Any lease or other contract payments made under the district's redevelopment plan shall also be deposited upon receipt into the special fund. Moneys derived from positive tax allocation increments, general fund moneys, and moneys derived from lease or other contract payments shall be accounted for separately within the special fund. Moneys shall be paid out of the fund only to pay redevelopment costs of the district or to satisfy claims of holders of tax allocation bonds issued for the district. The local legislative body shall irrevocably pledge all or a part of such special fund to the payment of the tax allocation bonds. The special fund or designated part thereof may thereafter be used only for the payment of the tax allocation bonds and interest until they have been fully paid, and a holder of said bonds shall have a lien against the special fund or said designated part thereof pledged for payment of said bonds and may either at law or in equity protect and enforce the lien. General funds derived from the tax allocation district may be used for payment of tax allocation bonds only to the extent that positive tax allocation increments and lease or other contract payments in the special fund are insufficient at any time to pay principal and interest due on such bonds. Subject to any agreement with bondholders, moneys in the fund may be temporarily invested in the same manner as other funds of the political subdivision. Except as provided in Code Section 36-44-20, general funds derived from the tax allocation district may be used for payment of tax allocation bonds only to the extent that positive tax allocation increments and lease or other contract payments in the special fund are insufficient at any time to pay the principal and interest due on such bonds. After all redevelopment costs and all tax allocation bonds of the district have been paid or provided for, subject to any agreement with bondholders, if there remains in the fund any moneys derived from positive tax allocation increments, they shall be paid over to each county, municipality, consolidated government, or county or independent board of education whose ad valorem property taxes were affected by the tax allocation district in proportion to the aggregate contribution of such taxes by such political subdivision less aggregate payments to such political subdivision pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (8) of Code Section 36-44-3 and in the same manner as the most recent distribution by the county tax collector or tax commissioner, municipal official responsible for collecting municipal ad valorem property taxes, or consolidated government official responsible for collecting consolidated government ad valorem property taxes. If there remains in the fund any other moneys, they shall be paid over to each political subdivision which contributed to the fund in proportion to the respective total contribution each made to the fund.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-11, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-12. Termination of tax allocation districts.

Statute text

The existence of a tax allocation district shall terminate when the local legislative body, by resolution, dissolves the district, but no such resolution may be adopted until all redevelopment costs have been paid.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-12, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-13. Payment of redevelopment costs.

Statute text

Payment of redevelopment costs may be made by any of the following methods or any combination thereof:

(1) Payment by the political subdivision from the special fund of the tax allocation district;

(2) Payment from the general funds of a political subdivision subject to the limitations of Code Sections 36-44-9 and 36-44-20;

(3) Payment out of the proceeds of the sale of revenue bonds issued by the political subdivision pursuant to Chapter 61 of this title, the "Urban Redevelopment Law," and revenue bonds may be issued under such law for redevelopment purposes within the meaning of this chapter;

(4) Payment out of the proceeds of the sale of tax allocation bonds issued by the political subdivision under this chapter;

(5) Payment from the proceeds from any loans made to a political subdivision pursuant to the authority of Code Section 36-44-16; and

(6) Lease payments and other payments pursuant to contracts under a redevelopment plan.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-14. Issuance of tax allocation bonds; authorization of tax allocation notes and other obligations; increasing security and marketability amount; certificate of validation; interest; redevelopment cost anticipation notes.

Statute text

(a) Only for the purpose of paying redevelopment costs for a tax allocation district created under this chapter, the local legislative body may issue tax allocation bonds. Tax allocation bonds are declared to be negotiable instruments. Tax allocation bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempted from all taxes.

(b) All tax allocation bonds, notes, and other obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the local legislative body, adopted by a majority vote of the members thereof at a regular or special meeting and without the necessity of a referendum or any electoral approval. The resolution shall state the name of the tax allocation district and the aggregate principal amount of the tax allocation bonds authorized.

(c) Tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by a local legislative body under this chapter shall be payable solely from the property pledged, mortgaged, conveyed, assigned, hypothecated, or otherwise encumbered to secure or to pay such bonds, notes, or other obligations, which property shall be limited to real or personal property acquired pursuant to this chapter and the proceeds from any source from which redevelopment costs may be paid under Code Section 36-44-13, but subject to the limitations of Code Sections 36-44-9 and 36-44-20. Each such bond, note, or other obligation shall contain recitals as are necessary to show that it is only so payable and that it does not otherwise constitute an indebtedness or a charge against the general taxing power of the political subdivision or county or independent board of education consenting to the use of property taxes as a basis for computing tax allocation increments or consenting to the use of general funds derived from the tax allocation district.

(d) To increase the security and marketability of tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations, a local legislative body may:

(1) Create a lien for the benefit of the bondholders upon any public improvements or public works financed thereby or the revenues therefrom; and

(2) Make covenants and do any and all acts not inconsistent with the Constitution or this chapter as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order additionally to secure tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations or tend to make them more marketable according to the best judgment of the local legislative body.

(e) Tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations shall bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times not more than 30 years from their respective dates, shall bear interest at such rate or rates which may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time, shall be subject to redemption on such terms, and shall contain such other terms, provisions, covenants, assignments, and conditions as the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, notes, or other obligations may permit or provide. The terms, provisions, covenants, assignments, and conditions contained in or provided or permitted by any resolution of the local legislative body authorizing the issuance of such tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations shall bind the members of the local legislative body then in office and their successors.

(f) The local legislative body shall have power from time to time and whenever it deems it expedient to refund any tax allocation bonds by the issuance of new tax allocation bonds, whether or not the bonds to be refunded have matured, and may issue such bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any other purpose permitted under this chapter. The refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded, with such cash adjustments as may be agreed upon, or may be sold at such price as the local legislative body may determine and the proceeds applied to the purchase or redemption of the bonds to be refunded.

(g) Tax allocation bonds may not be issued in an amount exceeding the estimated aggregated redevelopment costs for the tax allocation district. Any limitations with respect to interest rates or any maximum interest rate or rates found in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title, the "Revenue Bond Law," the usury laws of this state, or any other laws of this state shall not apply to tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations of a local legislative body.

(h) All tax allocation bonds issued by a local legislative body under this chapter shall be issued and validated under and in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title, the "Revenue Bond Law," except as provided in this chapter.

(i) Tax allocation bonds issued by a local legislative body may be in such form and may be subject to such exchangeability and transferability provisions as the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any indenture or trust agreement may provide.

(j) Tax allocation bonds shall bear a certificate of validation. The signature of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the issuing local legislative body is located may be made on the certificate of validation of such bonds by facsimile or by manual execution, stating the date on which such bonds were validated; and such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state.

(k) In lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which tax allocation bonds to be issued by a local legislative body are to bear, the notice to the district attorney or the Attorney General, the notice to the public of the time, place, and date of the validation hearing, and the petition and complaint for validation may state that the bonds when issued will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest, which rate may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time, specified in such notices and petition and complaint or may state that, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate so specified, which rate may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of a local legislative body to sell such tax allocation bonds at a discount, even if in doing so the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in such notices and in the petition and complaint.

(l) The term "redevelopment costs" shall have the meaning prescribed in this chapter whenever that term is referred to in tax allocation bond resolutions of a local legislative body, in tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations of a local legislative body, or in notices or proceedings to validate such bonds, notes, or other obligations of a local legislative body.

(m) Subject to the limitations and procedures provided by this chapter, the agreements or instruments executed by a local legislative body may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the local legislative body.

(n) The proceeds derived from the sale of all tax allocation bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by a local legislative body shall be held and used for the ultimate purpose of paying, directly or indirectly as permitted in this chapter, redevelopment costs or for the purpose of refunding any tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations issued in accordance with this chapter.

(o) Issuance by a local legislative body of one or more series of tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other tax allocation bonds, notes, or other obligations in connection with the same redevelopment plan or with any other redevelopment plan; but the proceeding wherein any subsequent bonds, notes, or other obligations are issued shall recognize and protect any prior loan agreement, mortgage, deed to secure debt, trust deed, security agreement, or other agreement or instrument made for any prior issue of bonds, notes, or other obligations, unless in the resolution authorizing such prior issue the right is expressly reserved to the local legislative body to issue subsequent bonds, notes, or other obligations on a parity with such prior issue. Once the political subdivision certifies by resolution that all tax allocation bonds contemplated by the redevelopment plan and all amendments thereto have been issued and all other redevelopment costs within a tax allocation district have been paid, all positive tax allocation increments collected within a tax allocation district shall be used to retire outstanding tax allocation bonds prior to their stated maturities, subject to any agreements made by the political subdivision with bondholders.

(p) A local legislative body shall have the power and is authorized, whenever tax allocation bonds of the local legislative body shall have been validated as provided in this chapter, to issue from time to time its notes in anticipation of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, whether or not the notes to be renewed have matured. The local legislative body may issue such bond anticipation notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. Such notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. As with its bonds, the local legislative body may sell such notes at public sale or at private sale. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing such notes of the local legislative body or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the local legislative body is authorized to include in any resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds of the local legislative body to any issue thereof; and the local legislative body may include in any such notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which the local legislative body is authorized to include in any bonds. Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of such notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated. Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-14, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-15. Determining tax millage rate; no freeze to ad valorem tax millage.

Statute text

For the purpose of fixing the tax millage rate to fund the annual budget of each political subdivision or county or independent board of education having the power to levy taxes or set ad valorem tax millage rates on property located within a tax allocation district, which has consented to the inclusion of its ad valorem property taxes for the computation of tax allocation increments as provided in Code Section 36-44-9, the taxable value of property subject to ad valorem property taxes within a tax allocation district shall not exceed the tax allocation increment base of the district until the district is terminated. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to freeze the ad valorem tax millage rate of any political subdivision or county or independent board of education consenting to the inclusion of its ad valorem property taxes as a basis for computing tax allocation increments, and any such rate may be increased or decreased at any time after the creation of a tax allocation district in the same manner and under the same authority that such rate has been previously fixed by such political subdivision or county or independent board of education.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-15, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-16. Loans for financing redevelopment costs.

Statute text

As an additional source for financing redevelopment costs, a political subdivision or its redevelopment agency may borrow funds from financial institutions and, in connection therewith, may pledge or assign lease contracts or revenue received from lease contracts on property owned by the political subdivision or its redevelopment agency within a redevelopment area. A political subdivision or its redevelopment agency is authorized to enter into contracts with financial institutions for the purpose of exercising the authority provided by this Code section, and such contracts may obligate the political subdivision or its redevelopment agency for any number of years not exceeding 25. Contractual obligations incurred by a political subdivision pursuant to this Code section shall not constitute debt within the meaning of Article IX, Section V of the Constitution.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-16, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-17. Limitation on creation of tax allocation district.

Statute text

No political subdivision may create a tax allocation district when the total current taxable value of property subject to ad valorem property taxes within the proposed district plus the total current taxable value of property subject to ad valorem property taxes within all its existing tax allocation districts exceeds 10 percent of the total current taxable value of all taxable property located within the area of operation of the political subdivision.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-17, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-18. Application of Urban Redevelopment Law.

Statute text

It is specifically provided that Code Section 36-61-16 of the "Urban Redevelopment Law," which Code section provides for cooperation among public bodies for redevelopment purposes under said law, shall be applicable to the exercise of redevelopment powers provided by this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-18, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-19. Contracting with private individuals or entities.

Statute text

A political subdivision may enter into any contract relating to the exercise of its redevelopment powers under this chapter with any private persons, firms, corporations, or business entities for any period not exceeding 30 years. Such contracts may include, without being limited to, contracts to convey or otherwise obligate real property for redevelopment under this chapter although that property has not yet been acquired at the time of contracting by the county or municipality.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-19, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-20. Requirement of insufficiency.

Statute text

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a local legislative body may use, pledge, or otherwise obligate its general funds for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds issued or incurred under this chapter but only if those general funds are derived from a designated tax allocation district and used for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds issued or incurred under this chapter for redevelopment of that district and only to the extent that positive tax increments or lease or other contract payments in that district's special fund are insufficient at any time to pay principal and interest due on such bonds.

(b) The requirement of insufficiency provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section may be satisfied by adoption of a resolution of the local legislative body finding that positive tax increments or lease or other contract payments in the district's special fund will be insufficient to pay principal and interest on bonds to be issued to finance redevelopment costs for the redevelopment described in the redevelopment plan.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-20, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-21. Public employees and officials prohibited from holding interest disclosures; voidability of prohibited transactions; misconduct in office.

Statute text

(a) No elected or appointed official or employee of a political subdivision or a board, commission, or redevelopment agency thereof shall voluntarily acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in a redevelopment area, or in any contract or transaction or proposed contract or transaction in connection with the redevelopment of that redevelopment area. Where such acquisition is not voluntary, the interest acquired shall be immediately disclosed in writing to the local legislative body and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the local legislative body. Any such elected or appointed official or employee who, within two years immediately prior to the date the plan is submitted to a local legislative body under subsection (b) of Code Section 36-44-7, acquires ownership or control of any interest, direct or indirect, in any property which is included in the redevelopment area designated in that plan and who retains that ownership or control at the time that such plan is so submitted shall, at least 30 days prior to the date scheduled for the local legislative body to adopt the plan, disclose the interest in writing to the local legislative body and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the local legislative body, and that person shall not participate in any action by the political subdivision, board, commission, or redevelopment agency thereof which affects that property. Any disclosure required to be made by this subsection shall concurrently be made to the redevelopment agency.

(b) Any contract or transaction in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section or disclosure of which is not made as provided in that subsection (a) shall be voidable by the local legislative body. This subsection shall not apply to any indenture, agreement, contract, or transaction which constitutes security, direct or indirect, for payment of bonds or other obligations incurred pursuant to a redevelopment plan, and the judgment and order confirming and validating any such bonds or other obligations shall constitute a final and conclusive adjudication as to any such security.

(c) Failure by an official or employee to comply with subsection (a) of this Code section shall constitute misconduct in office.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-21, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-22. Approval of local law; expansion of authorities by localities prohibited.

Statute text
